District of Columbia statutes.
48-842.01

Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Medication Advisory Committee Receiving Gifts or Remuneration Prohibition Act of 2008”.

History

Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-131, § 301, 55 DCR 1659